Utah statutes.
67-16-2.   Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to set forth standards of conduct for officers and employees of the state of Utah and its political subdivisions in areas where there are actual or potential conflicts of interest between their public duties and their private interests.  In this manner the Legislature intends to promote the public interest and strengthen the faith and confidence of the people of Utah in the integrity of their government.  It does not intend to deny any public officer or employee the opportunities available to all other citizens of the state to acquire private economic or other interests so long as this does not interfere with his full and faithful discharge of his public duties.

